Washington statutes.
RCW 41.44.100

Retirement fund—Deposit—Investment—Cost.

(1) A fund is hereby created and established to be known as the "statewide city employees retirement fund," and shall consist of all moneys paid into it in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, whether such moneys shall take the form of cash, securities, or other assets: PROVIDED, That such assets shall be public funds to the extent necessary to authorize any bank to deposit such collateral security necessary and required under the laws of the state to secure the deposit of public funds belonging to a city.

(2) The board of trustees shall be the custodian of the retirement fund and shall arrange for the safekeeping thereof. Subject to such provisions as may be prescribed by law for the deposit of city funds in banks, cash belonging to the retirement fund may be deposited in any licensed national bank or banks in the state, or in any bank, banks or corporations authorized or licensed to do a banking business and organized under the laws of the state of Washington; and may be withdrawn on order of the board for the purpose of making such payments as are authorized and required by this chapter.

(3) The board may invest pension fund moneys in such securities of the United States, states, Dominion of Canada, public housing authorities, municipal corporations and other public bodies, as are designated by the laws of the state as lawful investments for the funds of mutual savings banks, and to invest not to exceed twenty-five percent of the system's total investments in the securities of any corporations or public utility bodies as are designated by the laws of the state as lawful investments for the funds of mutual savings banks: PROVIDED, That not more than five percent of the system's total investments may be made in the securities of any one of such corporations or public utility bodies.

(4) Subject to the limitations hereinafter provided, investment of pension funds may also be made in amounts not to exceed twenty-five percent of the system's total investments in the shares of certain open-end investment companies: PROVIDED, That not more than five percent of the system's total investments may be made in the shares of any one such open-end investment company. The total amount invested in any one company shall not exceed five percent of the assets of such company, and shall only be made in the shares of such companies as are registered as "open-end companies" under the federal investment company act of 1940, as amended. Such company must be at least ten years old and have net assets of at least five million dollars. It must have no outstanding bonds, debentures, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness, or any stock having priority over the shares being purchased, either as to distribution of assets or payment of dividends. It must have paid dividends from investment income in each of the ten years next preceding purchase. The maximum selling commission on its shares may not exceed seven and one-half percent of the sum of the asset value plus such commission.

(5) Investment of pension funds may also be made in the bonds of any municipal corporation or other public body of the state; and in any of the bonds or warrants, including local improvement bonds or warrants within the protection of the local improvement guaranty fund law, issued by any city or town which is a member of the system. Investment of pension funds may also be made in the bonds or other obligations of any other state or territory of the United States or of any political subdivision, agency or instrumentality of any such state, territory, or political subdivision thereof.

Investment of pension funds may also be made in bonds or other obligations insured or guaranteed or which are covered by a repurchase agreement in whole or in part by the federal government or through any corporation, administrator, agency or instrumentality which is or hereafter may be created by the federal government.

(6) In order to provide for an equitable apportionment of the cost of the making and handling of the system's investments, the board may charge against the annual earnings from the system's investments, including income from the same and gains realized from the purchase and sale of its securities, a portion of such earnings computed on the book value of the investments held by the system at the end of its fiscal year, for the purpose of paying the cost of purchasing, safekeeping, servicing and handling its securities: PROVIDED, That such portion shall not exceed one-half of one percent of such value and shall not exceed the net gain from the operations for the year: PROVIDED FURTHER, That such charge shall not be considered as an administrative expense payable solely by the cities.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 28 s 3; 1965 ex.s. c 99 s 1; 1957 c 158 s 1; 1953 c 228 s 3; 1951 c 275 s 6; 1949 c 171 s 3; 1947 c 71 s 10; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 9592-139.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Severability—1967 ex.s. c 28: See notes following RCW 41.44.030.